Washington statutes.
RCW 41.45.207

Contribution rates for certain district or municipal court judges—Public employees' retirement system.

(1) The required employer contribution rate in support of public employees' retirement system members employed as district court judges and municipal court judges who elect to participate under RCW 41.40.127(1) or 41.40.873(1), or who are newly elected or appointed after January 1, 2007, shall equal the public employees' retirement system employer contribution rate established under this chapter.

(2) The required contribution rate for members of the public employees' retirement system plan 2 employed as district court judges or municipal court judges who elect to participate under RCW 41.40.127(1) or 41.40.873(1), or who are newly elected or appointed after January 1, 2007, shall be two hundred fifty percent of the member contribution rate for the public employees' retirement system plan 2 established under this chapter.

(3) The required contribution rate for members of the public employees' retirement system plan 1 employed as district court judges or municipal court judges who elect to participate under RCW 41.40.124(1), or who are newly elected or appointed after January 1, 2007, shall be the contribution rate established under RCW 41.40.330 plus six and twenty-six one-hundredths percent of pay.

[ 2006 c 189 s 19.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2006 c 189: See note following RCW 2.14.115.